Georgia statutes. TITLE 29 Guardian and Ward
PART 3 Jurisdiction

29-3-110.
Transfer of jurisdiction in event minor has permanently moved; determining minor’s residential status; filings.

A conservator may petition the Georgia court which has jurisdiction over the conservatorship to transfer the conservatorship to a foreign court of competent jurisdiction if the minor has moved permanently to the foreign jurisdiction.

The minor may be presumed to have moved permanently to the foreign jurisdiction if:

The minor has resided in the foreign jurisdiction for more than 12 consecutive months;

The conservator notifies the court that the minor will move or has moved permanently to the foreign jurisdiction; or

A foreign court of competent jurisdiction notifies the court of the filing of a petition for conservatorship for the minor in the foreign jurisdiction.

To facilitate the transfer of conservatorship the court may order the conservator to file a petition for receipt and acceptance of the conservatorship in the foreign jurisdiction.

If the foreign jurisdiction does not have a procedure for receiving and accepting a foreign conservatorship, the court may order the conservator to file a petition for conservatorship in the foreign jurisdiction.

History.

Code 1981, §

29-3-110

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 161, § 1.

29-3-111.
Requirements of petition to transfer conservatorship.

The petition to transfer a conservatorship to a foreign jurisdiction shall include the following:

The name and address of the foreign court to which the conservatorship shall be transferred and an authenticated copy of the petition for receipt and acceptance of a foreign conservatorship if previously filed in the foreign court;

A listing of any other conservatorship petitions that are pending in any jurisdiction and the names and addresses of the courts where the petitions have been filed;

The petitioner’s name, address, and county of domicile;

The name, age, and current address of the minor and the new or proposed address of the minor;

The names and current addresses of the adult siblings of the minor, if any;

The name and address of the person responsible for the care and custody of the minor, if other than the petitioner, and of any other conservator currently serving;

The name and address of the minor’s guardian, if any;

The name and address of the surety on the conservator’s bond;

The name and address of any legal representative, other than the petitioner, including any legal counsel, guardian ad litem, or court visitor appointed by the foreign court for the minor;

The reason for moving the minor; and

The reason the transfer of the conservatorship is in the minor’s best interest.

History.

Code 1981, §

29-3-111

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 161, § 1.

29-3-112.
Notice.

Notice and a copy of the petition to transfer a conservatorship to a foreign jurisdiction shall be served personally on the minor not less than ten days prior to the date set for the hearing. The notice shall state:

The date that the hearing shall be held; and

That the minor has the right to independent legal counsel and that the court shall appoint legal counsel for the minor unless the minor has retained counsel or legal counsel has been appointed by the foreign court to represent the minor in the receipt and acceptance of the guardianship.

Notice and a copy of the petition to transfer the conservatorship shall be provided to the foreign court to which the conservatorship is to be transferred.

Notice and a copy of the petition to transfer the conservatorship shall be mailed to all other persons named in the petition. The notice shall inform these persons of the date of the hearing and of their right to file objections to the transfer of the conservatorship by this state.

History.

Code 1981, §

29-3-112

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 161, § 1.

29-3-113.
Hearing.

Upon the court’s own motion or upon timely motion by the minor or by any interested person, the court shall hold a hearing to consider the petition to transfer the conservatorship.

History.

Code 1981, §

29-3-113

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 161, § 1; Ga. L. 2005, p. 60, § 29/HB 95.

29-3-114.
Required findings prior to granting petition to transfer; orderly and coordinated transfer of conservatorship.

The court may grant a petition to transfer a conservatorship to a foreign court of competent jurisdiction if the court finds that:

The conservator is presently in good standing with the court; and

The transfer of the conservatorship to the foreign jurisdiction is in the best interest of the minor.

In order to coordinate efforts with the foreign court to facilitate the orderly transfer of the conservatorship, the court is authorized to:

Notify the foreign court of any significant problems that may have occurred, including whether periodic reports and accountings have been filed in a satisfactory manner and whether all bond or other security requirements imposed under the conservatorship have been performed;

Forward copies of all documents filed with the court relating to the conservatorship, including but not limited to:

The initial petition for conservatorship and other filings relevant to the appointment of the conservator;

Reports and recommendations of guardians ad litem, court visitors, or other individuals appointed by the court to evaluate the appropriateness of the conservatorship;

Reports of physical or mental health practitioners describing the condition of the minor; and

Periodic status reports on the condition of the minor and the minor’s assets; and

Require the conservator to file an inventory of the minor’s property at the time of the transfer to the foreign jurisdiction.

As necessary to coordinate the transfer of the conservatorship the court is authorized to:

Delay the effective date of the transfer for a reasonable period of time;

Make the transfer contingent upon the acceptance of the conservatorship or appointment of the conservator in the foreign jurisdiction;

Recognize concurrent jurisdiction over the conservatorship for a reasonable period of time to permit the foreign court to accept the conservatorship or appoint the conservator in the foreign jurisdiction; or

Make other arrangements that in the sound discretion of the court are necessary to transfer the conservatorship.

History.

Code 1981, §

29-3-114

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 161, § 1.